Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 62U.10, subdivision 4; and 256B.69, subdivision 31a, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-05951 62U.10 HEALTH CARE TRANSFER, SAVINGS, AND REPAYMENT. Subd. 4. Repayment of transfer. When accumulated savings accruing to state-administered health care programs, as calculated under subdivision 3, meet or exceed $50,000,000, the commissioner of health shall certify that event to the commissioner of management and budget. In the next fiscal year following the certification, the commissioner of management and budget shall transfer $50,000,000 from the general fund to the health care access fund. The amount necessary to make the transfer is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. 256B.69 PREPAID HEALTH PLANS. Subd. 31a. Trend limit; calculation. (a) Beginning January 1, 2020, and ending June 30, 2024, the commissioner of human services may, to the extent practicable, limit the year over year increase in rates paid to managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans under this section and section 256B.692 by an amount equal to the value of a 0.8 percent reduction in rates in medical assistance across all products. Managed care rates must meet actuarial soundness and rate development requirements under Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, part 438, subpart A. Forecast expenditure growth assumptions cannot be part of the rate-setting process. (b) In the November 2019 forecast, the commissioner of human services, in consultation with the commissioner of management and budget, shall determine the extent to which the year over year change in managed care and county-based purchasing plan rates are forecasted to reduce medical assistance expenditures in fiscal years 2020 through 2024, relative to projected expenditures from the end of the 2019 legislative session that establish a budget for the Department of Human Services. To the extent the total value of the reduction is less than $145,150,000, the commissioner of management and budget shall transfer the difference from the premium security account established in section 62E.25, subdivision 1, to the general fund.